Hawaii statutes.
§412:3-505 Opening or relocating
out-of-state branch or agency. With the commissioner's prior written
approval, a Hawaii financial institution may open or relocate a branch or
agency that is outside of this State, including but not limited to any state,
possession, or territory of the United States or any foreign country. An
application to open or relocate an out-of-state branch or agency shall be filed
in accordance with section 412:3‑503. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1; am L
2013, c 172, §17]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next